Utah statutes.
22-3-106.   Adjustments.

Nothing in this chapter is intended to create or imply a duty to make an adjustment, and a trustee is not liable for not considering whether to make an adjustment or for choosing not to make an adjustment.



Enacted by Chapter 285, 2004 General Session

